New York, session 2025-2026, S3096.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 201-b 2 to read as follows: 3 § 201-b. Use of biodiesel and renewable diesel in state vehicles. 1. 4 Any diesel operated vehicles within the state fleet shall be replaced or 5 retrofitted, if necessary, to operate on biodiesel or renewable diesel 6 at the following levels: 7 a. For January first, two thousand twenty-six through December thir- 8 ty-first, two thousand twenty-six, five percent biodiesel or renewable 9 diesel; 10 b. For January first, two thousand twenty-seven through December thir- 11 ty-first, two thousand twenty-seven, ten percent biodiesel or renewable 12 diesel; 13 c. For January first, two thousand twenty-eight and thereafter, twenty 14 percent biodiesel or renewable diesel. 15 2. For purposes of this section, "biodiesel" or "renewable diesel" 16 shall mean a fuel that meets the requirements of the ASTM international 17 specification D6751 or the requirements of the ASTM international spec- 18 ification D975. "Renewable diesel" shall not include cessed biomass with 19 a feedstock that is not biomass; provided, however, that "renewable 20 diesel" shall be produced from hydroprocessing renewable biomass feeds- 21 tocks. "Biodiesel" shall mean renewable, biodegradable, mono alkyl ester 22 combustible liquid fuel derived from agricultural plant oils, animal 23 fats or waste oils and greases. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06957-01-5